North Carolina, session 2025, HB1229.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article VIII of the North Carolina Constitution is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"Sec. 3. Limitation on corporate powers.
A person, other than a human being, may not exercise political spending power in this State.
This limitation does not apply to political committees acting in a manner prescribed by law or to
a person distributing bona fide news, commentary, or editorial content if the person publishing
the content is owned or controlled by a political party, a political committee, or a candidate. Any
action violating the limitation of this section is ultra vires and void and shall result, as a matter
of law, in the withdrawal of all legal benefits the State confers on the person, including existence,
limited liability, or the authorization to transact business, subject only to reinstatement by act of
the General Assembly. A person organized or existing under the laws of another jurisdiction that
directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs the exercise of political spending power in
this State is conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this State. For purposes of this
section, political spending power is the legal capacity to expend money or anything of value to
influence the outcome of a vote of the electorate."
*H1229-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3, 2026,
which election shall be conducted under the laws governing elections at that time. The question
to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to (i) limit corporate powers regarding the ability to spend
money or anything of value to influence the outcome of a vote of the electorate and the exceptions
to that limitation; (ii) declare actions taken outside of those powers regarding political spending
are void and result in the withdrawal of State-conferred privileges, subject to legislative action
to reinstate such privileges; and (iii) define what constitutes political spending power."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment
among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the question are against
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 1229-First Edition